Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-756
Ground water augmentation project;
public hearing; notice.

On and after April 17, 2014, a board shall not vote to enter
into a ground water augmentation project without conducting a public hearing
on the project, with notice of the hearing given as provided in section 46-743.

Laws 2014, LB1098, § 16.